South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3441.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 25-11-40(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) Subject to the recommendation of a majority of the Senators representing the county and a majority of the House members representing the county, the secretary shall appoint a county veterans' affairs officer for each county in the State, whose term of office shall begin July first of each odd-numbered year and shall continue for a term of two years and until a successor shall be appointed. Qualifications shall be determined by the county legislative delegation upon a majority vote of the Senators representing the county and a majority of the House members representing the county. A county veterans' affairs officer is an at-will employee of the department county legislative delegation and is considered a county employee, subject to removal for cause at any time by the secretary, a majority of the Senators representing the county, and a majority of the House members representing the county. The secretary may offer recommendations to the county delegation after annual reviews of the local county veterans' affairs office. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----